sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
aberis/K po:verbu st:abèrrere 
abèrrere/K po:verbu
antepones/K po:verbu st:antepònnere 
antepònnere/K po:verbu
aparis/K po:verbu st:apàrrere 
apàrrere/K po:verbu
apartenes/K po:verbu st:apartènnere 
apartènnere/K po:verbu
apones/K po:verbu st:apònnere 
apònnere/K po:verbu
astenes/K po:verbu st:astènnere 
astènnere/K po:verbu
atenes/K po:verbu st:atènnere 
atènnere/K po:verbu
bàlere/K po:verbu
bales/K po:verbu st:bàlere 
benis/K po:verbu st:bènnere 
bènnere/K po:verbu
bòlere/K po:verbu
boles/K po:verbu st:bòlere 
cheres/K po:verbu st:chèrrere 
chèrrere/K po:verbu
coberis/K po:verbu st:cobèrrere 
cobèrrere/K po:verbu
còghere/J po:verbu
coghes/J po:verbu st:còghere 
contrafàghere/J po:verbu
contrafaghes/J po:verbu st:contrafàghere 
contrafatzo/J po:verbu st:contrafàghere 
contrapones/K po:verbu st:contrapònnere 
contrapònnere/J po:verbu
contraponnes/J po:verbu st:contrapònnere 
contravenes/K po:verbu st:contravènnere 
contravènnere/K po:verbu
cotzo/J po:verbu st:còghere 
cumbenis/K po:verbu st:cumbènnere 
cumbènnere/K po:verbu
cumpares/K po:verbu st:cumpàrrere 
cumpàrrere/K po:verbu
cumpones/K po:verbu st:cumpònnere 
cumpònnere/K po:verbu
cunfàghere/J po:verbu
cunfaghes/J po:verbu st:cunfàghere 
cunfatzo/J po:verbu st:cunfàghere 
cunferis/K po:verbu st:cunfèrrere 
cunfèrrere/K po:verbu
cuntenes/K po:verbu st:cuntènnere 
cuntènnere/K po:verbu
cuntrapones/K po:verbu st:cuntrapònnere 
cuntrapònnere/K po:verbu
depones/K po:verbu st:depònnere 
depònnere/K po:verbu
detenes/K po:verbu st:detènnere 
detènnere/K po:verbu
disfàghere/J po:verbu
disfaghes/J po:verbu st:disfàghere 
disfatzo/J po:verbu st:disfàghere 
dispones/K po:verbu st:dispònnere 
dispònnere/K po:verbu
espones/K po:verbu st:espònnere 
espònnere/K po:verbu
fàghere/J po:verbu
faghes/J po:verbu st:fàghere 
fatzo/J po:verbu st:fàghere 
feris/K po:verbu st:fèrrere 
fèrrere/K po:verbu
imbenis/K po:verbu st:imbènnere 
imbènnere/K po:verbu
impones/K po:verbu st:impònnere 
impònnere/K po:verbu
intervenes/K po:verbu st:intervènnere 
intervènnere/K po:verbu
iscoberis/K po:verbu st:iscobèrrere 
iscobèrrere/K po:verbu
iscumbàtere/J po:verbu
iscumbates/J po:verbu st:iscumbàtere 
iscumpares/K po:verbu st:iscumpàrrere 
iscumpàrrere/K po:verbu
iscumpones/K po:verbu st:iscumpònnere 
isfàghere/J po:verbu
isfaghes/J po:verbu st:isfàghere 
isfatzo/J po:verbu st:isfàghere 
mantenes/K po:verbu st:mantènnere 
mantènnere/K po:verbu
moris/K po:verbu st:mòrrere 
mòrrere/K po:verbu
oferis/K po:verbu st:ofèrrere 
ofèrrere/K po:verbu
opones/K po:verbu st:opònnere 
opònnere/K po:verbu
otenes/K po:verbu st:otènnere 
otènnere/K po:verbu
pares/K po:verbu st:pàrrere 
pàrrere/K po:verbu
pertenes/K po:verbu st:pertènnere 
pertènnere/K po:verbu
pòdere/J po:verbu
podes/J po:verbu st:pòdere 
pones/K po:verbu st:pònnere 
pònnere/K po:verbu
potzo/J po:verbu st:pòdere 
predispones/K po:verbu st:predispònnere 
predispònnere/K po:verbu
preferis/K po:verbu st:prefèrrere 
prefèrrere/K po:verbu
presupones/K po:verbu st:presupònnere 
presupònnere/K po:verbu
prevenis/K po:verbu st:prevènnere 
prevènnere/K po:verbu
propones/K po:verbu st:propònnere 
propònnere/K po:verbu
recheres/K po:verbu st:rechèrrere 
rechèrrere/K po:verbu
referis/K po:verbu st:refèrrere 
refèrrere/K po:verbu
retenes/K po:verbu st:retènnere 
retènnere/K po:verbu
ritenes/K po:verbu st:ritènnere 
ritènnere/K po:verbu
satisfàghere/J po:verbu
satisfaghes/J po:verbu st:satisfàghere 
satisfatzo/J po:verbu st:satisfàghere 
soddisfàghere/J po:verbu
soddisfaghes/J po:verbu st:soddisfàghere 
soddisfatzo/J po:verbu st:soddisfàghere 
subenes/K po:verbu st:subènnere 
subènnere/K po:verbu
subrafàghere/J po:verbu
subrafaghes/J po:verbu st:subrafàghere 
subrafatzo/J po:verbu st:subrafàghere 
subrapones/K po:verbu st:subrapònnere 
subrapònnere/K po:verbu
supones/K po:verbu st:supònnere 
supònnere/K po:verbu
sustenes/K po:verbu st:sustènnere 
sustènnere/K po:verbu
sutapones/K po:verbu st:sutapònnere 
sutapònnere/K po:verbu
tenes/K po:verbu st:tènnere 
tènnere/K po:verbu
tratenes/K po:verbu st:tratènnere 
tratènnere/K po:verbu
